Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:(1) If a change of residence is required by official military orders for a student's active duty parent, the student in transition must be permitted by the school district to remain enrolled in the school the student attends through the end of the school year.(2) A student in transition whose status changes due to the end of active duty status for the student's parent during the school year must be permitted by the school district to remain enrolled in the school the student attends through the end of the school year, or if enrolled in grades nine through 12, through graduation.(3) Nonresident school districts are not required to provide transportation to and from the school unless otherwise required by state or federal law.(4) For the purposes of this section "active duty," "student," and "transition" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.216 and 2019 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A child of a military family complies with the residency requirements for enrollment in a school district if a parent of the child is transferred to, or is pending transfer to, a military installation within the state while on active duty pursuant to official military orders.(b) ((A))Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a parent of the child must provide to the school district proof of residence in the school district within ((fourteen))14 days of the arrival date provided on official military documentation. The parent may use the address of any of the following as proof of residence in the school district:(i) A temporary on-base billeting facility;(ii) A purchased or leased residence, or a signed purchase and sale agreement or lease agreement for a residence; or(iii) Any federal government housing or off-base military housing, including off-base military housing that may be provided through a public-private venture.(2) A school district shall accept, on a conditional basis, an application for enrollment and course registration, including enrollment in a specific school or program within the school district, by electronic means for children of military families who meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section. Upon satisfaction of the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section, the school district shall finalize the enrollment of children of military families.(3) If a residence meeting the requirements of subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section is unavailable for more than 14 and fewer than 90 days at the time of enrollment in a school district, the child of a military family complies with the residency requirements for enrollment in the school district where the temporarily unavailable residence is located.(4) Nonresident school districts are not required to provide transportation to and from the school unless otherwise required by state or federal law.(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Active duty" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.(b) "Child of a military family" and "children of military families" have the same meaning as "children of military families" in RCW 28A.705.010.(c) "Military installation" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.(d) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or other person or entity having legal custody of a child of a military family.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.225.220 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 510 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any board of directors may make agreements with adults choosing to attend school, and may charge the adults reasonable tuition.(2) A district is strongly encouraged to honor the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to attend a school in another district or the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to transfer as a student receiving home-based instruction.(3) A district shall release a student to a nonresident district that agrees to accept the student if:(a) A financial, educational, safety, or health condition affecting the student would likely be reasonably improved as a result of the transfer; ((or))(b) Attendance at the school in the nonresident district is more accessible to the parent's place of work or to the location of child care; ((or))(c) There is a special hardship or detrimental condition; ((or))(d) The student is a child of a military family; or(e) The purpose of the transfer is for the student to enroll in an online course or online school program offered by an online provider approved under RCW 28A.250.020.(4) A district may deny the request of a resident student to transfer to a nonresident district if the release of the student would adversely affect the district's existing desegregation plan.(5) For the purpose of helping a district assess the quality of its education program, a resident school district may request an optional exit interview or questionnaire with the parents or guardians of a child transferring to another district. No parent or guardian may be forced to attend such an interview or complete the questionnaire.(6) Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, school districts may not charge transfer fees or tuition for nonresident students enrolled under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.225.225. Reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high school pupils of a nonhigh school district shall not be deemed a transfer fee as affecting the apportionment of current state school funds.(7) For purposes of this section, "child of a military family" has the same meaning as "children of military families" as defined in RCW 28A.705.010.--- END ---